Washington statutes.
RCW 43.34.015

Secretary of committee—Committee records.

The commissioner of public lands shall be the secretary of the state capitol committee, but the committee may appoint a suitable person as acting secretary thereof, and fix his or her compensation. However, all records of the committee shall be filed in the office of the commissioner of public lands.

[ 1997 c 279 s 2; 1965 c 8 s 43.34.015. Prior: 1959 c 257 s 45; 1909 c 69 s 1; RRS s 7897. Formerly RCW 79.24.080.]